Washington statutes.
RCW 18.390.020

Requirement to register.

A person or entity must be registered by the department under this chapter prior to:

(1) Operating a continuing care retirement community;

(2) Entering into a residency agreement with a prospective resident;

(3) Soliciting a prospective resident to pay an application fee or executing a residency agreement; or

(4) Collecting an entrance fee.

[ 2016 c 183 s 2.]